Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 6. PRODUCTION, PROCESSING, AND SALE OF ANIMAL PRODUCTS

SUBTITLE B. LIVESTOCK

CHAPTER 150. IMPORTED MEAT

SUBCHAPTER A. SALE OF IMPORTED FRESH MEAT

Sec. 150.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Fresh meat" means a quarter, half, or whole carcass of beef, pork, or mutton or a cut or other part of the carcass that has not been canned, cooked, or otherwise processed.

(2) "Ground meat" includes fresh meat subsequently ground or commingled.

(3) "Imported fresh meat" means fresh meat imported from a foreign nation. The term includes ground meat any part of which is fresh meat imported from a foreign nation.

(4) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, association, or corporation.

(5) "Retail store" means a grocery store, butcher shop, delicatessen, or other place where fresh meat is sold at retail for consumption off premises.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 2.02(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 150.002. LABELING OF IMPORTED FRESH MEAT. (a) A person may not knowingly sell at wholesale or at a retail store any imported fresh meat unless the person complies with the requirements prescribed by this section.

(b) The requirements of Subsections (c) and (d) of this section apply only to imported fresh meat offered for sale at wholesale or at a retail store.

(c) A label or brand shall be placed on each quarter, half, or whole carcass of imported fresh meat and on each individually wrapped or packaged cut or other part of imported fresh meat.

(d) A label or sign shall be placed on each tray or case in which unwrapped or unpackaged cuts or slices of imported fresh meat are displayed for selection by a patron and on each tray or other container in which imported fresh meat, including hamburger, ground meat, or sausage, is displayed in bulk.

(e) The label, brand, or sign must contain the words "Product of _____________" (nation of origin of the imported fresh meat) or other words clearly indicating the nation of origin. The label or sign for imported fresh meat described by Subsection (d) must be conspicuous and legible.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 2.02(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 150.003. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly violates Section 150.002 of this code.

(b) A first offense under this section is punishable by a fine of not less than $25 nor more than $200. A subsequent offense under this section is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500, confinement in the county jail for not less than 30 days nor more than 90 days, or both.

(c) The Texas Department of Health shall enforce Section 150.002 of this code and shall file a sworn complaint against any person who violates that section.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 2.02(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER B. PURCHASE OF IMPORTED BEEF BY STATE AGENCIES AND POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS

Sec. 150.011. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Political subdivision" means a county or municipality or a school, junior college, water, hospital, reclamation, or other special-purpose district.

(2) "State agency" means an agency, department, board, or commission of the state or a state eleemosynary, educational, rehabilitative, correctional, or custodial facility.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 2.02(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 150.012. PURCHASE OF IMPORTED BEEF BY STATE AGENCY OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. (a) A state agency or political subdivision may not purchase beef or a product consisting substantially of beef that has been imported from outside the United States.

(b) The Texas Department of Health shall enforce this section and shall receive reports of violations of this section.

(c) The Texas Board of Health shall adopt rules for the reporting of purchases covered by this section by state agencies and political subdivisions and for the reporting of violations of this section.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 2.02(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.